Illinois, session 104th, SB3407.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Hospital Licensing Act is amended by adding 5Section 11.11 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 85/11.11 new)7    Sec. 11.11. Health insurance premiums for hospital 8employees.9    (a) In this Section:10    "Covered hospital employee" means any of the following:11        (1) An employee of a large hospital who provides 12    patient care, health care services, or services supporting 13    the provision of health care, which includes, but is not 14    limited to, employees performing work in the occupation of 15    a nurse, physician, caregiver, medical resident, intern or 16    fellow, patient care technician, janitor, housekeeping 17    staff person, groundskeeper, guard, clerical worker, 18    nonmanagerial administrative worker, food service worker, 19    gift shop worker, technical and ancillary services worker, 20    medical coding and medical billing personnel, scheduler, 21    call center and warehouse worker, and laundry worker, 22    regardless of formal job title.23        (2) A contracted or subcontracted employee, if all of   SB3407- 2 -LRB104 18001 BAB 31438 b1    the following apply:2            (A) The employee's employer contracts with the 3        hospital employer, or with a contractor or 4        subcontractor to the hospital employer, to provide 5        health care services or services supporting the 6        provision of health care.7            (B) The hospital directly or indirectly, or 8        through an agent or any other person, exercises 9        control over the employee's wages, hours, or working 10        conditions. However, "covered hospital employee" 11        includes all employees performing contracted or 12        subcontracted work primarily on the premises of a 13        hospital to provide health care services or services 14        supporting the provision of health care.15    "Health insurance premium" means any money charged to a 16hospital, plan sponsor, or other entity to provide for the 17medical, dental, or vision insurance coverage for a covered 18hospital employee.19    "Health system" means any entity that:20        (1) owns or operates at least one hospital; or21        (2) sponsors, supports, or administers graduate 22    medical education programs across a consortium of 23    independent or affiliated hospitals or medical or 24    osteopathic colleges or schools.25    "Large hospital" means a hospital licensed under this Act 26that has net patient revenue of at least $1,000,000,000 per   SB3407- 3 -LRB104 18001 BAB 31438 b1year or is part of a health system that has net patient revenue 2of at least $1,000,000,000 per year.3    (b) A hospital licensed under this Act shall not charge a 4covered hospital employee more than 10% of the total health 5insurance premium cost. The requirements of this Section may 6not be waived. Any agreement permitting a charge to a covered 7hospital employee in excess of 10% of the total health 8insurance premium cost shall be deemed invalid, void, and 9unenforceable under this Section.10    (c) A hospital in violation of this Section shall pay a 11civil penalty of $500 to the Department for each impacted 12covered hospital employee.